Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-226
Fur-bearing animals, defined.

Fur-bearing animals means all beaver, martens, mink, muskrats, raccoons, opossums, otters, bobcats, gray foxes, red foxes, badgers, long-tailed weasels, Canada lynx, and skunks, except mutation minks and mutation foxes.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 36;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 5.